Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.040

Time to correct violations—Revisit—Issuance of penalties.

(1) The owner and operator shall be given a reasonable period of time to correct violations identified during a technical assistance visit before any civil penalty provided for by law is imposed for those violations. A regulatory agency may revisit a facility, business, or other location after a technical assistance visit and a reasonable period of time has passed to correct violations identified by the agency in writing and issue civil penalties as provided for by law for any uncorrected violations.

(2) During a visit under subsection (1) of this section, the regulatory agency may not issue civil penalties for violations not previously identified in a technical assistance visit, unless the violations are of the type for which the agency may issue a citation: (a) During a technical assistance visit under RCW 43.05.050; or (b) under RCW 43.05.090.

[ 2001 c 190 s 1; 1995 c 403 s 605.]